Indiana, session 2026, HB1318.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 31-33-8-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.131-2009,
SECTION 44, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), If a
child who is the subject of a report under this chapter is less than
five (5) years of age, a department caseworker:
(1) shall physically examine the child's head, face, arms, legs,
chest, and back for bruises or contusions; and
(2) if the caseworker finds evidence of abuse under
subdivision (1), shall:
(A) immediately take the child into custody under
IC 31-34-2-3;
(B) except as provided in subsection (c), cause color
photographs to be taken of the areas of trauma visible on
the child;
(C) cause a medical examination of the child to be
performed; and
(D) if medically indicated, cause a radiological examination
2026 IN 1318—LS 7037/DI 119


of the child to be performed.
(b) If a child who is the subject of a report under this chapter is
not less than five (5) years of age, the department:
(1) shall, (1) except as provided in subsection (c), cause color
photographs to be taken of the areas of trauma visible on a the
child; who is subject to a report;
(2) may cause a:
(A) health screening; or
(B) medical examination;
of the child to be performed; and
(2) (3) if medically indicated, shall cause a radiological
examination of the child to be performed.
(b) (c) If the law enforcement agency participates in the assessment,
the law enforcement agency shall cause the color photographs to be
taken as provided by this section.
(c) (d) The department shall reimburse the expenses of: the
(1) photographs under subsection (a)(2)(B) or (b)(1);
(2) a health screening or medical examination under
subsection (a)(2)(C) or (b)(2); and
(3) x-rays under subsection (a)(2)(D) or (b)(3).
2026 IN 1318—LS 7037/DI 119